src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NI-breitheamh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:breitheamh^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:breithimh^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:breitheamh        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:breithiúna^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:breithiúna^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:breithiúna        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-ollamh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ollamh^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:ollaimh^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:ollamh        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:ollúna^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:ollúna^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:ollúna        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-aonach
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aonach^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:aonaigh^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:aonach        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:aontaí^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:aontaí^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:aontaí        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-iasc
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:iasc^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:éisc^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:iasc          Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:éisc^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:iasc^G       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:éisc      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-cara
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:cara^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:carad^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:cara          Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:cairde^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:cairde^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:cairde        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-bith
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:bith^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:beatha^M^C        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:bith          Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-dada
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:dada^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:dada^M^C      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:dada          Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-comhrá
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:comhrá^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:comhrá^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:comhrá            Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:comhráite^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:comhráite^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:comhráite     Voc-initial;


LEXICON NI-conradh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:conradh^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:conartha^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:conradh           Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:conarthaí^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:conarthaí^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:conarthaí     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-dia
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Dia^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:Dé^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:Dia           Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:déithe^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:déithe^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:déithe        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-duine
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:duine^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:éinne^M^C     Nom-sg-initial; ! éinne = aon duine, anyone
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aoinne^M^C        Nom-sg-initial; ! aoinne = aon duine, anyone
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:duine^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:duine     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:daoine^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:daoine^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:daoine        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-lá
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:lá^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ló^M^C        Nom-sg-initial; ! CANÚINT/VARIANT
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:lae^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:lá            Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:laethanta^C           Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:laethanta^G        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:laethanta     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-mac
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:mac^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:mic^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:mac           Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:mic^C         Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:mac^G      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:maca      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-muineál
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:muineál^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:muiníl^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:muineál       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:muiníl^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:muineál^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:muiníl        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-scrúdú
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:scrúdú^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:scrúdaithe^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:scrúdú            Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:scrúduithe^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:scrúduithe^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:scrúduithe        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-smaoineamh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:smaoineamh^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:smaoinimh^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:smaoineamh            Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:smaointe^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:smaointe^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:smaointe      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-tada
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:tada^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:tada^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:tada          Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-talamhM
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:talamh^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:talaimh^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:talamh            Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:tailte^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:tailte^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:tailte        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-teach
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:teach^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:tí^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:teach         Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg:tigh          #;
+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+Len:thigh         #;
+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+Ecl:dtigh         #;
+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg:tig           #;
+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+Ecl:dtig          #;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:tithe^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:tithe^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:tithe     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-fiche
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:fiche^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:fichead^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:fiche         Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+Len:fhichid       #;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:fichidí^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:fichid^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:fichidí^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:fichidí       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-daichead
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:daichead^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:daichid^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:daichead      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:daichidí^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:daichidí^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:daichidí      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-dearg
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:dearg^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:deirg^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:dearga        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:dearga^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:dearg^G      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:dearga        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-earc
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:earc^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:eirc^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:earca         Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:earca^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:earc^G       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:earca     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-each
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:each^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:eich^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:eacha         Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:eacha^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:each^G       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:eacha     Voc-initial;
