src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounsIrregular
fiche:		NI-fiche;
daichead:	NI-daichead;
dada:		NI-dada;
comhrá:		NI-comhrá;
conradh:	NI-conradh;
dréachtchonradh:dréacht^CB	NI-conradh;
saorchonradh:saor^CB	NI-conradh;
dia:		NI-dia;
bandia:ban		NI-dia;
scrúdú:		NI-scrúdú;
smaoineamh:	NI-smaoineamh;
duine:		NI-duine;
lá:		NI-lá;
ceannlá:ceann		NI-lá;
mac:		NI-mac;
garmhac:gar		NI-mac;
muineál:	NI-muineál;			! neck
tada:		NI-tada;
talamh:		NI-talamhM;
teach:		NI-teach;
díonteach:díon^CB		NI-teach;
proinnteach:proinn^CB		NI-teach;
cloigtheach:cloig^CB		NI-teach;
cléirtheach:cléir^CB		NI-teach;
cara:			NI-cara;
eascara:eas		NI-cara;
rúnchara:rún^CB		NI-cara;
anamchara:anam^CB	NI-cara;
aonach:		NI-aonach;
iasc:		NI-iasc;
gailliasc:gaill		NI-iasc;
ollamh:		NI-ollamh;
breitheamh:	NI-breitheamh;
daichead:		NI-daichead;
dearg:		NI-dearg;
corcairdhearg:corcair^CB	NI-dearg;
earc:		NI-earc;
each:		NI-each;
